fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-2-anapiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - anapiy :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      anapiy+N+A+Sg: anapiy   #  a net, a fishing-net, a gill net
      anapiy+N+A+Pl: anapiyak   #  nets, fishing-nets, gill nets
      anapiy+N+A+Obv: anapiya   #  an/other net(s), an/other fishing-net(s), an/other gill net(s)

      # Poss
      anapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitanapiy   #  my net, my fishing-net, my gill net
      anapiy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otanapiya   #  his/her other net(s), his/her other fishing-net(s), his/her other gill net(s)
      

      # Nonposs
      anapiy+N+A+Sg: anapiy   #  a net, a fishing-net, a gill net
      anapiy+N+A+Pl: anapiyak   #  nets, fishing-nets, gill nets
      anapiy+N+A+Obv: anapiya   #  an/other net(s), an/other fishing-net(s), an/other gill net(s)
      anapiy+N+A+Distr: anapînâhk   #  among nets, among fishing-nets, among gill nets
      

      # Der/Dim
      anapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [anapîs, anapîsis]  #  a little net, a little fishing-net, a little gill net
      

      # Poss # Sg
      anapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitanapiy   #  my net, my fishing-net, my gill net
      anapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitanapiy   #  your net, your fishing-net, your gill net
      
      anapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitanapînân   #  our net, our fishing-net, our gill net
      anapiy+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kitanapînaw   #  your and our net, your and our fishing-net, your and our gill net
      anapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitanapîwâw   #  your net, your fishing-net, your gill net
      
      
      

      # Poss # Pl
      anapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitanapiyak   #  my nets, my fishing-nets, my gill nets
      anapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitanapiyak   #  your nets, your fishing-nets, your gill nets
      
      anapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitanapînânak   #  our nets, our fishing-nets, our gill nets
      anapiy+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kitanapînawak   #  your and our nets, your and our fishing-nets, your and our gill nets
      anapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitanapîwâwak   #  your nets, your fishing-nets, your gill nets
      
      
      

      # Poss # Obv
      anapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitanapiya   #  my other net(s), my other fishing-net(s), my other gill net(s)
      anapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kitanapiya   #  your other net(s), your other fishing-net(s), your other gill net(s)
      anapiy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otanapiya   #  his/her other net(s), his/her other fishing-net(s), his/her other gill net(s)
      anapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nitanapînâna   #  our other net(s), our other fishing-net(s), our other gill net(s)
      anapiy+N+A+Px12Pl+Obv: kitanapînawa   #  your and our other net(s), your and our other fishing-net(s), your and our other gill net(s)
      anapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kitanapîwâwa   #  your other net(s), your other fishing-net(s), your other gill net(s)
      anapiy+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otanapîwâwa   #  their other net(s), their other fishing-net(s), their other gill net(s)
      anapiy+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otanapîniwa   #  another's/others' other net(s), another's/others' other fishing-net(s), another's/others' other gill net(s)
      
